Illinois, session 104th, HB4412.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Capital Development Board Act is amended by 5adding Section 9.06a as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3105/9.06a new)7    Sec. 9.06a. Public-private partnership agreements. To 8enter into contracts and manage construction projects pursuant 9to a public-private partnership agreement on behalf of an 10institution of higher education or a State agency, excluding 11the Department of Corrections, if the State agency or 12institution of higher education is authorized by statute or 13otherwise permitted to enter into a public-private partnership 14agreement. The Board may adopt rules to implement this 15Section.